Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-226
Purposes.

(MBCA 3.01) (a) Every corporation incorporated
under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act has the purpose of engaging
in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles
of incorporation.

(b) A corporation engaging
in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this
state may incorporate under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act only
if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

(c) Corporations shall not
be organized under the act to perform any professional services as specified
in section 21-2202 except for professional services rendered by a designated
broker as defined in section 81-885.01.

(d) A designated broker as defined in section 81-885.01
may be organized as a corporation under the Nebraska Model Business Corporation
Act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 26.
January 1, 2016